Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB721.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8348.8. Supplemental annuity commencing 2025.(a) Benefits.--Commencing with the first monthly annuity payment after July 1, 2025, an eligible benefit recipient shall be entitled to receive an additional monthly supplemental annuity from the system. The additional monthly supplemental annuity under this section shall be in addition to the supplemental annuities provided for under sections 8348 (relating to supplemental annuities), 8348.1 (relating to 123456789101112131415161718192021 additional supplemental annuities), 8348.2 (relating to further additional supplemental annuities), 8348.3 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1994), 8348.4 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment), 8348.5 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1998), 8348.6 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2002) and 8348.7 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2003).(b) Amount of additional supplemental annuity.--The amount of the supplemental annuity payable under this section shall be a percentage of the amount of the monthly annuity payment on July 1, 2025, determined on the basis of the most recent effective date of retirement as follows:Most recent effective date Percentage factorof retirementJuly 2, 2000, through July 1, 2001 15%July 2, 1999, through July 1, 2000 15.5%July 2, 1998, through July 1, 1999 16%July 2, 1997, through July 1, 1998 16.5%July 2, 1996, through July 1, 1997 17%July 2, 1995, through July 1, 1996 17.5%July 2, 1994, through July 1, 1995 18%July 2, 1993, through July 1, 1994 18.5%July 2, 1992, through July 1, 1993 19%July 2, 1991, through July 1, 1992 19.5%July 2, 1990, through July 1, 1991 20%July 2, 1989, through July 1, 1990 20.5%July 2, 1988, through July 1, 1989 21%July 2, 1987, through July 1, 1988 21.5%July 2, 1986, through July 1, 1987 22%July 2, 1985, through July 1, 1986 22.5%20250SB0721PN0943 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 July 2, 1984, through July 1, 1985 23%July 2, 1983, through July 1, 1984 23.5%July 2, 1982, through July 1, 1983 24%Prior to July 2, 1982 24.5%(c) Payment.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be paid automatically unless the annuitant files a written notice with the board requesting that the additional monthly supplemental annuity not be paid.(d) Conditions.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable under the same terms and conditions as provided under the option plan in effect as of July 1, 2025, and shall be subject to any subsequent modification of that option plan.(e) Benefits to beneficiaries or survivors.--No supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable to the beneficiary or survivor annuitant of a member who dies before July 1, 2025, or the effective date of this subsection, whichever is later.(f) Funding.--The additional liability for the increase in benefits provided under this section shall be funded in equal dollar annual installments over a period of 10 years beginning July 1, 2026, unless a different funding source is otherwise provided by State law.(g) Eligible benefit recipient.--(1) An eligible benefit recipient is an individual:(i) who is receiving a superannuation, withdrawal or disability annuity on July 1, 2025;(ii) whose most recent effective date of retirement is prior to July 2, 2001;(iii) whose credited service does not include any 20250SB0721PN0943 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 service credited as Class T-D service;(iii.1) who is not a multiple service member with Class D-4 or Class AA service credited in the State Employees' Retirement System; and(iv) who has not died before the effective date of this subparagraph.(2) A supplemental annuity provided under this section shall not be payable to an annuitant receiving a withdrawal annuity prior to the first day of July coincident with or following the annuitant's attainment of superannuation age.Section 2. Title 71 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5708.9. Supplemental annuity commencing 2025.(a) Benefits.--Commencing with the first monthly annuity payment after July 1, 2025, an eligible benefit recipient shall be entitled to receive an additional monthly supplemental annuity from the system. The additional monthly supplemental annuity under this section shall be in addition to the supplemental annuities provided for under sections 5708 (relating to supplemental annuities), 5708.1 (relating to additional supplemental annuities), 5708.2 (relating to further additional supplemental annuities), 5708.3 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1994), 5708.4 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment), 5708.5 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 1998), 5708.6 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2002), 5708.7 (relating to supplemental annuities commencing 2003) and 5708.8 (relating to special supplemental postretirement adjustment of 2002).(b) Amount of additional supplemental annuity.--The amount of the supplemental annuity under this section shall be a 20250SB0721PN0943 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 percentage of the amount of the monthly annuity payment on July 1, 2025, determined on the basis of the most recent effective date of retirement as follows:Most recent effective date Percentage factorof retirementJuly 2, 2000, through July 1, 2001 15%July 2, 1999, through July 1, 2000 15.5%July 2, 1998, through July 1, 1999 16%July 2, 1997, through July 1, 1998 16.5%July 2, 1996, through July 1, 1997 17%July 2, 1995, through July 1, 1996 17.5%July 2, 1994, through July 1, 1995 18%July 2, 1993, through July 1, 1994 18.5%July 2, 1992, through July 1, 1993 19%July 2, 1991, through July 1, 1992 19.5%July 2, 1990, through July 1, 1991 20%July 2, 1989, through July 1, 1990 20.5%July 2, 1988, through July 1, 1989 21%July 2, 1987, through July 1, 1988 21.5%July 2, 1986, through July 1, 1987 22%July 2, 1985, through July 1, 1986 22.5%July 2, 1984, through July 1, 1985 23%July 2, 1983, through July 1, 1984 23.5%July 2, 1982, through July 1, 1983 24%Prior to July 2, 1982 24.5%(c) Payment.--The supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be paid automatically unless the annuitant files a written notice with the board requesting that the additional monthly supplemental annuity not be paid.(d) Conditions.--The supplemental annuity provided under 20250SB0721PN0943 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section shall be payable under the same terms and conditions as provided under the option plan in effect as of July 1, 2025, and shall be subject to any subsequent modification of that option plan.(e) Benefits to beneficiaries or survivors.--No supplemental annuity provided under this section shall be payable to the beneficiary or survivor annuitant of a member who dies before July 1, 2025, or the effective date of this subsection, whichever is later.(f) Funding.--The additional liability for the increase in benefits provided under this section shall be funded as provided in section 5508(e)(2) (relating to actuarial cost method).(g) Eligible benefit recipient.--(1) An eligible benefit recipient is an individual:(i) who is receiving a superannuation, withdrawal or disability annuity on July 1, 2025;(ii) whose most recent effective date of retirement is prior to July 2, 2001;(iii) whose credited service does not include any service credited as either Class D-4 or Class AA service;(iii.1) who is not a multiple service member with Class T-D service credited in the Public School Employees' Retirement System; and(iv) who has not died before the effective date of this subparagraph.(2) A supplemental annuity provided under this section shall not be payable to an annuitant receiving a withdrawal annuity prior to the first day of July coincident with or following the annuitant's attainment of superannuation age.Section 3. Title 72 is amended by adding a chapter to read:20250SB0721PN0943 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHAPTER 19SPECIAL FUNDSSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Budget Stabilization Reserve FundSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)SUBCHAPTER BBUDGET STABILIZATION RESERVE FUNDSec.1911. Disposition of Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund.§ 1911. Disposition of Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund.(a) Purpose.--It is the intent of the General Assembly that:(1) Money from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund be appropriated only when emergencies involving the health, safety or welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth or downturns in the economy resulting in significant unanticipated revenue shortfalls cannot be dealt with through the normal budget process.(2) Money in the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund shall not be used to begin new programs but to provide for the continuation of vital public programs in danger of being eliminated or severely reduced due to financial problems resulting from the economy.(b) Appropriation.-- Except as provided under subsections (c) and (d), whenever the Governor determines that an appropriation from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund is necessary to meet emergencies involving the health, safety or welfare of the residents of this Commonwealth or to counterbalance downturns of 20250SB0721PN0943 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the economy which result in significant unanticipated revenue shortfalls, the Governor shall present a request for an appropriation which may include the specifics of the proposal and suggested ancillary and substantive legislation as may be necessary to the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives. The General Assembly may then through approval of a separate appropriation bill by a vote of two-thirds of the members elected to the Senate and the House of Representatives appropriate money from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to meet the needs identified in the Governor's proposal. Any money appropriated according to this section which has then lapsed shall be returned to the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund.(c) Transfer.--No later than November 30, 2020, $100,000,000 shall be transferred from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to the General Fund and shall be available for appropriation by the General Assembly.( d) Interest account.-- (1) The Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund Interest Account is established as a restricted account within the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund.(2) Interest accruing on money in the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund shall be transferred to the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund Interest Account on a continuing basis.(3) On July 1, 2025, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, money in the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund Interest Account shall be transferred to the General Fund and shall be available for appropriation by the General Assembly 20250SB0721PN0943 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the payment of supplemental annuities under 24 Pa.C.S. § 8348.8 (relating to supplemental annuity commencing 2025) and 71 Pa.C.S. § 5708.9 (relating to supplemental annuity commencing 2025).Section 4. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 72 Pa.C.S. § 1911.(2) Section 1703-A of the act of April. 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed.Section 5. The addition of 72 Pa.C.S. § 1911 is a continuation of section 1703-A of the act of April. 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code. The following apply:(1) Except as otherwise provided in 72 Pa.C.S. § 1911, all activities initiated under section 1703-A of The Fiscal Code shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under 72 Pa.C.S. § 1911. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under section 1703-A of The Fiscal Code and which are in effect on the effective date of section 4(2) of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under 72 Pa.C.S. § 1911. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under section 1703-A of The Fiscal Code are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of section 1703-A of The Fiscal Code.(2) Except as specified in paragraph (3), any difference in language between 72 Pa.C.S. § 1911 and section 1703-A of The Fiscal Code is intended only to conform to the style of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes and is not intended to 20250SB0721PN0943 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 change or affect the legislative intent, judicial construction or administration and implementation of section 1703-A of The Fiscal Code.(3) Paragraph (2) does not apply to the addition of 72 Pa.C.S. § 1911(b) and (d).Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0721PN0943 - 10 - 123456